Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 4 Clearance and Rehabilitation of Blighted Areas

Cross references.

Urban redevelopment plans generally, §

36-61-1

et seq..

Development authorities of counties and municipalities, §

36-62-1

et seq.

8-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the “Redevelopment Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey of developments in Georgia real property law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1981).

8-4-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

It is found and declared:

That there exist in many communities within this state blighted areas, as defined in Code Section 8-4-3, or areas in the process of becoming blighted;

That such areas impair economic values and tax revenues; that such areas cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the state; that these conditions necessitate excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for crime prevention and punishment, public health and safety, fire and accident protection, and other public services and facilities;

That the clearance, replanning, and preparation for rebuilding of these areas and the prevention of the reduction of blight and its causes are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired and are governmental functions of state concern;

That there are also certain areas where the condition of the title, the diverse ownership of the land to be assembled, the street or lot layouts, or other conditions prevent a proper development of the land; that it is in the public interest that such areas, as well as blighted areas, be acquired by eminent domain and made available for sound and wholesome development in accordance with a redevelopment plan; and that the exercise of the power of eminent domain and the financing of the acquisition and preparation of land by a public agency for such redevelopment is likewise a public use and purpose;

That redevelopment activities will stimulate residential construction which is closely correlated with general economic activity; and that such undertakings authorized by this chapter will aid the production of better housing and more desirable neighborhood and community development at lower costs and will make possible a more stable and larger volume of residential construction, which will assist materially in achieving and maintaining full employment;

That there exists an emergency housing shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings for families of low income; and

That it is in the public interest that advance preparation for such projects and activities be made now; and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted by this chapter is declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 2.

8-4-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Blighted areas” means:

Areas in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, or which are predominantly residential in character, and which, by reason of:

Dilapidation, deterioration, age, or obsolescence;

Inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces;

High density of population and overcrowding;

The existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; or

Any combination of such factors,

are conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime and are detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and

Areas which, by reason of:

The predominance of defective or inadequate street layout;

Faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness;

Insanitary or unsafe conditions;

Deterioration of site improvements;

Diversity of ownership;

Tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land;

Defective or unusual conditions of title;

Improper subdivision or obsolete platting;

The existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes; or

Any combination of such factors,

substantially impair or arrest the sound growth of the community, retard the provision of housing accommodations, or constitute an economic or social liability and are a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in their present condition and use.

“Redevelopment plan” means a plan, other than a preliminary or tentative plan, for the acquisition, clearance, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or future use of a redevelopment project area. Such plan shall be sufficiently complete to indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements and to indicate the proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment project area.

“Redevelopment project” means:

Any work or undertaking to acquire blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or improvements, the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such blighted areas or to the prevention of the spread or recurrence of slum conditions or conditions of blight;

Any work or undertaking to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, and site improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan;

Any work or undertaking to sell, lease, or otherwise make available land in such areas for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other use, or for public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and

The preparation of a redevelopment plan; the planning, survey, and other work incident to a redevelopment project; and the preparation of all plans and arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 1.

8-4-4.
Power of authorities to prepare redevelopment plans and to undertake redevelopment projects; scope of authorities’ powers, privileges, and immunities.

Any housing authority established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, the “Housing Authorities Law,” is authorized to prepare or cause to be prepared redevelopment plans and to undertake redevelopment projects within its area of operation, in accordance with this chapter. In undertaking such redevelopment projects, a housing authority shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities that such authority has under Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, the “Housing Authorities Law,” and any other provision of law relating to slum clearance and housing projects for persons of low income, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power to make and execute contracts, to issue bonds and other obligations and give security therefor, to acquire real property by eminent domain or purchase, and to do any and all things necessary to carry out projects in the same manner as though all of the provisions of law applicable to slum clearance and housing projects were applicable to redevelopment projects undertaken under this chapter, provided that nothing contained in Code Sections 8-3-11 and 8-3-12 shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority, in the event of a default by a purchaser or lessee of land in a redevelopment plan, to acquire property and operate it free from the restrictions contained in said Code sections.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 2.

Cross references.

Property-acquisition policies relating to federal-aid public works projects, §

22-4-9

et seq.

8-4-5.
Approval of redevelopment projects by cities.

An authority shall not initiate any redevelopment project under this chapter until the governing body, planning agency, or other legally designated and empowered public agency of each city in which any of the area to be covered by the project is situated has approved the redevelopment plan for the redevelopment project area.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 5; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 3.

8-4-6.
Power of authorities to make property available for use by private enterprise or public agencies; manner of valuation of property; obligations of purchasers and lessees.

An authority may make land in a redevelopment project available for use by private enterprise or public agencies in accordance with the redevelopment plan. Such land may be made available at its fair value, which represents the value, whether expressed in terms of rental or capital price, at which the authority determines such land should be made available in order that it may be developed or redeveloped for the purpose specified in such plan.

To assure that land acquired in a redevelopment project is used in accordance with the redevelopment plan, an authority, upon the sale or lease of such land, shall obligate purchasers or lessees:

To use the land for the purpose designated in the redevelopment plan;

To begin the building of improvements within such period of time as the authority fixes as reasonable; and

To comply with such other conditions as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Any such obligations by the purchaser shall be covenants and conditions running with the land where the authority so stipulates.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 7.

8-4-7.
Taxation of leased property.

Any property which the authority leases to private corporations, individuals, or partnerships for development under a redevelopment plan shall have the same tax status as if such leased property were owned by such private corporations, individuals, or partnerships.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 8.

8-4-8.
Acquisition and development by authorities of lands not within blighted areas for redevelopment projects; findings required prior to acquisition; projects involving more than one city.

Upon a determination, by resolution, of the governing body of the city in which such land is located that the acquisition and development of undeveloped vacant land, not within a blighted area, is essential to the proper clearance or redevelopment of blighted areas or a necessary part of the general slum clearance program of the city, the acquisition, planning, preparation for development, or disposal of such land shall constitute a redevelopment project which may be undertaken by the authority in the manner provided in this chapter. The determination by the governing body shall not be made until such body finds that there is a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing in the city; that such undeveloped vacant land will be developed for predominantly residential uses; and that the provision of decent, safe, and sanitary housing on such undeveloped vacant land is necessary to the relocation of families to be displaced from blighted areas in the city which are under redevelopment.

In the undertaking of redevelopment projects on a regional or unified metropolitan basis, which projects involve the acquisition and development of undeveloped vacant land in one city as an adjunct to the redevelopment of blighted areas in another city, each determination or finding required in this Code section shall be made by the governing body of the city with respect to which the determination or finding relates.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 7.

8-4-9.
Cooperation by state public bodies in aid of redevelopment projects.

Any state public body, as defined in Code Section 8-3-152, shall have the same rights and powers to cooperate with and assist housing authorities with respect to redevelopment projects that such state public body has pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 3 of this title, the “Housing Cooperation Law,” for the purpose of assisting the development or administration of slum clearance and housing projects, in the same manner as though Article 2 of Chapter 3 of this title were applicable to redevelopment projects undertaken under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 6.

8-4-10.
Financial aid from federal government; security for aid.

An authority may borrow money or accept contributions from the federal government to assist in its undertakings and redevelopment projects. An authority may do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure such financial aid (including obligating itself, in any contract with the federal government for financial assistance, to convey to the federal government the project to which said contract relates upon the occurrence of a substantial default thereunder), in the same manner as though it were securing such aid in connection with slum clearance and housing projects under Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, the “Housing Authorities Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 9; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 4.

Cross references.

Programs for relocation of persons and businesses displaced by federal-aid public works projects, §

22-4-1

et seq.

8-4-11.
Bonds and other obligations as legal investments and security.

Bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority in connection with a redevelopment project pursuant to this chapter, which bonds or obligations are secured by a contract with the federal government for financial assistance, shall be security for public deposits and legal investments to the same extent and for the same persons, institutions, associations, corporations, and other bodies and officers as bonds or other obligations which are secured by a contract with the federal government for annual contributions issued pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, the “Housing Authorities Law,” in connection with the development of slum clearance or housing projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 10; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 5.

8-4-12.
Investment in projects; acquisition, development, and sale of lands and improvements in project areas.

Notwithstanding any restriction or limitation on investments contained in any other laws of this state, any building and loan association, any savings and loan association, any investment company, or any insurance company or association is authorized:

To invest its funds in projects contemplated by this chapter;

To acquire and hold land;

To acquire or erect apartment, tenement, or other dwelling houses, not including hotels but including accommodations for retail stores, shops, offices, and other community services reasonably incidental to such projects; to own, maintain, manage, and collect or receive income from such apartment, tenement, or other dwelling houses; and

To sell or convey such land and the improvements thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 157, § 10; Ga. L. 1951, p. 683, § 6.